California, session 20252026, SB96.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The heading of Chapter 27.3 (commencing with Section 22775) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read: CHAPTER 27.3. Streaming ServicesSEC. 2. Section 22775 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22775. For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Video programming” has the same meaning as defined in Section 613(h) of Title 47 of the United States Code.(b) (1) “Video streaming service” means an entity that makes available directly to the consumer, through a distribution method that uses internet protocol, either of the following:(A) Video programming.(B) Video content the entity makes available for users to view.(2) “Video streaming service” includes a user-generated video streaming service.(3) “Video streaming service” does not include a television broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video programing distributor, or an entity that serves video programming or video content without commercial advertisements.SEC. 3. Section 22776 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22776. On and after July 1, 2026, January 1, 2027, a music streaming service, podcast streaming service, or video streaming service that serves consumers residing in the state shall not transmit the audio of commercial advertisements louder than the content the advertisements accompany, consistent with the regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation (CALM) Act (Public Law 111-311) for television broadcast stations, cable operators, and other multichannel video programming distributors.